src/lexica/conj.lexc
!!!conj.lexc!!!

Multichar_Symbols +Conj

LEXICON Root
Conj;

LEXICON ConjInf
+Conj:0 #;

LEXICON Conj
!Lexical items from corpus
اگرنه	ConjInf;
منتها	ConjInf;
بلکه	ConjInf;
منتهی	ConjInf;
اگه	ConjInf;
و	ConjInf;
بی‌آنکه	ConjInf;
،	ConjInf;
که	ConjInf;
ولیکن	ConjInf;
اینکه	ConjInf;
همچنین	ConjInf;
-	ConjInf;
اگر	ConjInf;
اما	ConjInf;
الی	ConjInf;
یا	ConjInf;
خواه	ConjInf;
لکن	ConjInf;
لیکن	ConjInf;
تا	ConjInf;
ولی	ConjInf;
